Utah statutes.
63G-7-602.   Compromise and settlement of claims.
(1)  A political subdivision, after conferring with its legal officer or other
legal counsel if it does not have a legal officer, may compromise and settle
any action as to the damages or other relief sought.
(2)  The risk manager in the Department of Administrative Services may
compromise and settle any action against the state for which the Risk
Management Fund may be liable:
(a)  on the risk manager's own authority, if the amount of the settlement is
$25,000 or less;
(b)  with the concurrence of the attorney general or the attorney general's
representative and the executive director of the Department of Administrative
Services if the amount of the settlement is $25,000.01 to $100,000; or
(c)  by complying with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter
10, State Settlement Agreements, if the amount of the settlement is more than
$100,000.
